dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX C 0 yowa/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yowu/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yoy/sY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yoyi/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yoz/sY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yozi/sY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG
PFX C 0 yuba/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yubu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuk/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 yuku/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 yuku/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukub/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukub/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuba/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukubu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukubw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuk/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuku/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukukw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukul/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukul/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuli/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukulu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukulw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukum/nY . REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukun/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukung/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukungi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuni/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukus/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukusi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuw/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuw/nY o REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuwa/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuwu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuy/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuyi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuz/nY [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukuzi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yukw/nY [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 yuli/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yulu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yum/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yungi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuni/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yusi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuwa/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuwu/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuyi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 yuzi/nY [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 z/BY [aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 zasek/mX o POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 zaseku/mX [^aeiou] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 zasekw/mX [ae] POSSESSIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 zi/BY [^aeiou] OBJ
PFX C 0 zisek/mX o COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 ziseku/mX [^aeiou] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 zisekw/mX [ae] COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx+INFINITIVE
PFX C 0 zo/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT
PFX C 0 zob/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zob/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoba/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zobu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zobw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zok/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 zok/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoku/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 zoku/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokub/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokub/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuba/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokubu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokubw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuk/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuku/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokukw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokul/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokul/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuli/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokulu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokulw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokum/sY . NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokun/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokung/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokungi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuni/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokus/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokusi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuw/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuw/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuwa/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuwu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuy/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuyi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuz/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokuzi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zokw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG
PFX C 0 zokw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zol/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zol/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoli/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zolu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zolw/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zom/sY . NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zon/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zong/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zongi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoni/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zos/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zosi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zow/sY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zow/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zow/sY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zowa/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zowu/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoy/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoyi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zoz/sY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zozi/sY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG
PFX C 0 zuba/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zubu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zuk/nY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 zuku/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG
PFX C 0 zuku/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_SHORT_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukub/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukub/nY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuba/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukubu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukubw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuk/nY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuku/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukukw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukul/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukul/nY o NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukuli/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukulu/nY [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukulw/nY [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukum/nY . NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 zukun/nY [aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_IND_LONG_NEG_with_OBJ
