dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
abuka/BC
ahluleka/BC
amukela/BC
anyusa/BC
baleka/BC
bangisa/BC
beleka/BC
bhakuza/BC
bhaxabula/BC
bheyila/BC
bhomba/BC
bhunya/BC
binya/BC
bonisela/BC
buluza/BC
buyelela/BC
casuka/BC
ceza/BC
chitha/BC
cikica/BC
congobezela/BC
cusha/BC
dambisa/BC
didiyela/BC
dinwa/BC
dlova/BC
donsisana/BC
dunguzela/BC
eduka/BC
ehluleka/BC
eluleka/BC
enca/BC
enkaba/BC
enzela/BC
esonga/BC
ethula/BC
eyipha/BC
fela/BC
finya/BC
fudumezela/BC
fundiswa/BCY
gabisa/BC
ganisa/BC
gcogcoma/BC
gebenga/BC
gigiyela/BC
godla/BC
gonyuluka/BC
gqashula/BC
gqugquzela/BC
gugula/BC
gwacela/BC
gxamalazela/BC
habaza/BC
haya/BC
hlahla/BC
hlamba/BC
hlangula/BC
hlengezela/BC
hlokoloza/BC
hlubula/BC
hlusula/BC
holwa/BCY
husha/BC
jezisa/BC
jova/BC
kapaka/BC
khalaza/BC
khankasa/BC
khathalela/BC
khetwa/BCY
khohlisa/BC
khonka/BC
khuculula/BC
khulelwa/BC
khumula/BC
khuza/BC
klabha/BC
klikliza/BC
kwitiza/BC
lamula/BC
layeza/BC
libaza/BC
linganisela/BC
lola/BC
luma/BC
lutha/BC
matha/BC
mela/BC
minya/BC
moyiza/BC
musa/BC
ncintisana/BC
nela/BC
nesa/BC
ngcinga/BC
ngoma/BC
nika/BC
nkema/BC
nqaka/BC
nqikaza/BC
nswininiza/BC
nunusa/BC
nximfa/BC
nyamalala/BC
nyenya/BC
nyukubala/BC
olula/BC
onga/BC
osula/BC
pana/BC
phakatha/BC
phandla/BC
phasa/BC
pheka/BC
phendula/BC
phephuka/BC
phikisana/BC
phithana/BC
phoqelela/BC
phula/BC
phumuza/BC
phusha/BC
printa/BC
qalaza/BC
qapha/BC
qekelela/BC
qhatha/BC
qhilika/BC
qhuda/BC
qhuthulula/BC
qinisa/BC
qongqa/BC
qothuka/BC
quza/BC
sala/BC
sayina/BC
seka/BC
shada/BC
shayanisa/BC
shela/BC
shicelela/BC
shila/BC
shiwa/BC
shova/BC
shunqisela/BC
shwabana/BC
sikaza/BC
sindana/BC
siphuza/BC
sizakala/BC
songa/BC
sukuma/BC
swakama/BC
tanya/BC
telebhela/BC
thanda/BC
thandela/BC
thathwa/BCY
thema/BC
thengisa/BC
thimula/BC
thokozela/BC
thombulula/BC
thukuthela/BC
thuntutha/BC
thutha/BC
tika/BC
tshatha/BC
tshinga/BC
vakasha/BC
veza/BC
vimbela/BC
vuka/BC
vumelana/BC
vunguza/BC
vuvuzela/BC
washa/BC
womba/BC
xabana/BC
xega/BC
xhantela/BC
xhopha/BC
xokozela/BC
xova/BC
yabiza/BC
yayiza/BC
yendela/BC
yisa/BC
yoca/BC
za/BC
zama/BC
zibekela/BC
zimuka/BC
ziya/BC
zoyiza/BC
PFX B 0 0 [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 abangayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 abayo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 angazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 elingazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 eng [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 engazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engingayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 engizo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 eningazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esingayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 esingazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ez [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ezingayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ezo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 obungayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 obuzo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okungazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okwa [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olungazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX N 0 ng a INSTRUMENTAL/REFERENTIAL_PARTICLE
PFX O i abase . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a engise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a ese . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O i ezise . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O a obuse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX O u oluse . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE+COPULATIVE+LOC_pfx
PFX V 0 e . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX V 0 ezi . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 ama . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 engingem . NEG_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX W 0 oku . RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
